Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.135

Registration of order—Effect.

(1) If a guardian has been appointed in another state for an individual, and a petition for guardianship for the individual is not pending in this state, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court, may register the guardianship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment, in a court of an appropriate county of this state, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

(2) If a conservator has been appointed in another state for an individual, and a petition for conservatorship for the individual is not pending in this state, the conservator appointed for the individual in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court, may register the conservatorship in this state by filing as a foreign judgment, in a court of a county in which property belonging to the individual subject to conservatorship is located, certified copies of the order of conservatorship, letters of office, and any bond or other verified receipt required by the court.

(3) On registration under this section of a guardianship or conservatorship order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order except as prohibited by this chapter and law of this state other than this chapter. If the guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, the guardian or conservator may maintain an action or proceeding in this state subject to any condition imposed by this state on an action or proceeding by a nonresident party.

(4) The court may grant any relief available under this chapter and law of this state other than this chapter to enforce an order registered under this section.

[ 2019 c 437 s 127.]